test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-stumt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - stumt: # Verb 'eng push/fin työntää' - _STUMT_ full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/stumt/
     stumt+V+Inf: stumt
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg1: stumšu
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Sg2: stumsi
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl1: stumsim
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Fut+Pl2: stumsiet
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Fut+SP3: stums

     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg1: stumju
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Sg2: stum
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl1: stumjam
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prs+Pl2: stumjat
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prs+SP3: stumj

     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: stūmu
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: stūmi
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: stūmām
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: stūmāt
     stumt+V+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: stūma

     stumt+V+Deb+Prs: jāstum
     stumt+V+Quo+Prs: stumjot
     stumt+V+Quo+Fut: stumšot
     stumt+V+Imprt+Sg2: stum
     stumt+V+Imprt+Pl2: stumiet

     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stumjošs
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: stumjoša
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: stumjošam
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stumjošu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: stumjošā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stumjoši
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: stumjošu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: stumjošiem
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: stumjošus
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: stumjošos
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: stumjošais
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: stumjošā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: stumjošajam
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: stumjošo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: stumjošajā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [stumjošais, stumjošo]
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: stumjošie
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: stumjošo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: stumjošajiem
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: stumjošos
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: stumjošajos
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: stumjošie
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: stumjoša
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: stumjošas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: stumjošai
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: stumjošu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: stumjošā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: stumjošas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: stumjošu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: stumjošām
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: stumjošas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: stumjošās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: stumjošā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: stumjošās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: stumjošajai
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: stumjošo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: stumjošajā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: stumjošā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: stumjošās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: stumjošo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: stumjošajām
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: stumjošās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: stumjošajās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: stumjošās

     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stūmis
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: stūmuša
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: stūmušam
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stūmušu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: stūmušā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stūmuši
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: stūmušu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: stūmušiem
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: stūmušus
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: stūmušos
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: stūmušais
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: stūmušā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: stūmušajam
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: stūmušo
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: stūmušajā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: stūmušais
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: stūmušie
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: stūmušo
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: stūmušajiem
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: stūmušos
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: stūmušajos
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: stūmušie
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: stūmusi
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: stūmušas
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: stūmušai
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: stūmušu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: stūmušā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: stūmušas
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: stūmušu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: stūmušām
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: stūmušas
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: stūmušās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: stūmusī
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: stūmušās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: stūmušajai
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: stūmušo
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: stūmušajā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: stūmusī
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: stūmušās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: stūmušo
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: stūmušajām
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: stūmušās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: stūmušajās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: stūmušās

     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stumjams
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: stumjama
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: stumjamam
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stumjamu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: stumjamā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stumjami
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: stumjamu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: stumjamiem
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: stumjamus
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: stumjamos
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: stumjamais
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: stumjamā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: stumjamajam
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: stumjamo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: stumjamajā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [stumjamais, stumjamo]
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: stumjamie
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: stumjamo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: stumjamajiem
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: stumjamos
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: stumjamajos
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: stumjamie
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: stumjama
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: stumjamas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: stumjamai
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: stumjamu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: stumjamā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: stumjamas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: stumjamu
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: stumjamām
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: stumjamas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: stumjamās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: stumjamā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: stumjamās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: stumjamajai
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: stumjamo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: stumjamajā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: stumjamā
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: stumjamās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: stumjamo
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: stumjamajām
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: stumjamās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: stumjamajās
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: stumjamās

     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stumts
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: stumta
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: stumtam
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stumtu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: stumtā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stumti
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: stumtu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: stumtiem
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: stumtus
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: stumtos
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: stumtais
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: stumtā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: stumtajam
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: stumto
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: stumtajā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: stumtais
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: stumtie
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: stumto
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: stumtajiem
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: stumtos
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: stumtajos
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: stumtie
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: stumta
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: stumtas
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: stumtai
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: stumtu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: stumtā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: stumtas
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: stumtu
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: stumtām
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: stumtas
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: stumtās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: stumtā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: stumtās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: stumtajai
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: stumto
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: stumtajā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: stumtā
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: stumtās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: stumto
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: stumtajām
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: stumtās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: stumtajās
     stumt+V+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: stumtās
#"Declension":"4"
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: stumšana
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: stumšanas
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: stumšanai
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: stumšanu
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: stumšanā
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: stumšana
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: stumšanas
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: stumšanu
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: stumšanām
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: stumšanas
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: stumšanās
     stumt+V+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: stumšanas
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: stūmdams
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: stūmdama
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: stūmdami
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: stūmdamas

#     stumt+V+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši


     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: stūmiens
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: stūmiena
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: stūmienam
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: stūmienu
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: stūmienā
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [stūmiens, stūmien]
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: stūmieni
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: stūmienu
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: stūmieniem
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: stūmienus
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: stūmienos
     stumt+V+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: stūmieni

     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: stumjot
     stumt+V+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: stumjam
     stumt+V+Cond: stumtu
     stumt+V+Deb+Quo: jāstumjot
